Idaho, session 2026, S1311.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-8008, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8008. IGNITION INTERLOCK SYSTEMS.
(1)(a) If a person is convicted, is found guilty, pleads guilty or re-
ceives a withheld judgment for violating any of the provisions of this
chapter relating to driving under the influence and has had any or all of
a sentence or fine suspended for the violation, the court shall, unless
an exception is granted pursuant to section 18-8002(12), Idaho Code,
impose the sanction provided for in this section in addition to any
other penalty or fine imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(b) The court shall order the person to have a state-approved ignition
interlock system installed, at his expense, on all motor vehicles op-
erated by him. A court may determine that an offender is eligible to
utilize available funds from the court interlock device and electronic
monitoring device fund, as outlined in section 18-8010, Idaho Code, for
the installation and operation of an ignition interlock device, based
on evidence of financial hardship.
(2) The calibration setting at which the ignition interlock system will
prevent the motor vehicle from being started shall be .025. The ignition in-
terlock vendor shall notify the prosecuting authority any time a person is
prevented from starting a motor vehicle, as provided in this subsection.
(3) As used in this chapter, the term "ignition interlock system" means
breath alcohol ignition interlock device, including a camera, certified by
the transportation department, designed to prevent a motor vehicle from be-
ing operated by a person who has consumed an alcoholic beverage.
(4) The transportation department shall by rule provide standards for
the certification, installation, repair and removal of the devices. The ig-
nition interlock vendor shall provide proof of installation of the ignition
interlock system to the transportation department.
(5) The court shall notify the transportation department of its order
imposing a sanction pursuant to this section. The department shall attach
or imprint a notation on the driver's license or other document granting the
person restricted driving privileges of any person restricted under this
section that the person may operate only a motor vehicle equipped with an
ignition interlock system. The ignition interlock restriction period shall
end one (1) year from the date the ignition interlock vendor provides proof
of installation of the ignition interlock system.


(6) When a court orders a person to install and use an ignition inter-
lock system pursuant to this section, the court shall order the person to pay
the cost for obtaining, installing, utilizing and maintaining the ignition
interlock system. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be in
addition to any other fines or penalty provided by law and shall be deposited
in the court interlock device and electronic monitoring device fund created
in section 18-8010, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.